Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7807
Primary Care Investment Council; report.

On or before November 1, 2023, and on or before each November 1 until November 1, 2028, the Primary Care Investment Council shall prepare and the department shall electronically submit a report to the Executive Board of the Legislative Council and the Governor which contains, at a minimum, the Primary Care Investment Council's findings under section 71-7805 and any additional findings from the council regarding health care spending and health outcomes.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 17.